apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="BASE__guchy">
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chego</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymu</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chego</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chych</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymi</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chego</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymu</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chego</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chych</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymi</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chego</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymu</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chy</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chych</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymi</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chŏ</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chyj</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chyj</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chõ</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chōm</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chyj</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chŏ</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chych</l>     <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymi</l>     <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chych</l>     <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chego</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymu</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chych</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chymi</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>chym</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gu/chy__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>chy<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__guchy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cho</l>       <r>chy<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="cichy">           <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ci</r></p><par n="gu/chy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="guchy">           <i>gu</i><par n="gu/chy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="suchy">           <i>su</i><par n="gu/chy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kruchy">          <i>kru</i><par n="gu/chy__adj"/></e>
